apertium-br-fr.br.dix
    <pardef n="g/elver__vblex">
      <e><p><l>elver</l><r>elver<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>alvet</l><r>elver<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>alvan</l><r>elver<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>alvez</l><r>elver<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>alv</l><r>elver<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>alvomp</l><r>elver<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>alvit</l><r>elver<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>alvont</l><r>elver<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>alver</l><r>elver<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="impers"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>alven</l><r>elver<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>alves</l><r>elver<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>alve</l><r>elver<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>alvemp</l><r>elver<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>alvec’h</l><r>elver<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>alvent</l><r>elver<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>alved</l><r>elver<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="impers"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>alvis</l><r>elver<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>alvjout</l><r>elver<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>alvas</l><r>elver<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>alvjomp</l><r>elver<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>alvjoc’h</l><r>elver<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>alvjont</l><r>elver<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>alvjod</l><r>elver<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="impers"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>alvin</l><r>elver<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>alvi</l><r>elver<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>alvo</l><r>elver<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>alvimp</l><r>elver<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>alvot</l><r>elver<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>alvint</l><r>elver<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>alvor</l><r>elver<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="impers"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>alvfen</l><r>elver<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>alvfes</l><r>elver<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>alvfe</l><r>elver<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>alvfemp</l><r>elver<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>alvfec’h</l><r>elver<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>alvfent</l><r>elver<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>alvfed</l><r>elver<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="impers"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>alvjen</l><r>elver<s n="vblex"/><s n="cip"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>alvjes</l><r>elver<s n="vblex"/><s n="cip"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>alvje</l><r>elver<s n="vblex"/><s n="cip"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>alvjemp</l><r>elver<s n="vblex"/><s n="cip"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>alvjec’h</l><r>elver<s n="vblex"/><s n="cip"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>alvjent</l><r>elver<s n="vblex"/><s n="cip"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>alvjed</l><r>elver<s n="vblex"/><s n="cip"/><s n="impers"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>alv</l><r>elver<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>alvomp</l><r>elver<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>alvit</l><r>elver<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>alvent</l><r>elver<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="gelver" r="LR"><par n="initial-g"/><i></i><par n="g/elver__vblex"/></e>
